Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.15
Interpretation of sections.

Sections 23-1114 and 23-1114.02 to 23-1114.07 shall be interpreted so as to effectuate their general purpose, to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for the members of the county board, and to give effect to such salaries as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1971, LB 574, § 8.